Washington statutes.
RCW 24.40.060

Present articles of incorporation may be amended—Application to new corporation.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit the power of any corporation not for profit now or hereafter incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington

(1) to at any time amend its articles of incorporation or other instrument governing such corporation by any amendment process open to such corporation under the laws of the state of Washington to provide that some or all provisions of RCW 24.40.010 and 24.40.020 shall have no application to such corporation; or

(2) in the case of any such corporation formed after June 10, 1971, to provide in its articles of incorporation that some or all provisions of RCW 24.40.010 and 24.40.020 shall have no application to such corporation.

[ 1971 c 59 s 7.]